Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2228
Obtaining benefits; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

Any person who by means of a willfully false statement or representation, by impersonation, or by other device obtains or attempts to obtain or aids or abets any person to obtain or to attempt to obtain (1) a food instrument to which he, she, or it is not entitled, (2) any supplemental foods to which such person is not entitled, or (3) any other benefit administered by the Department of Health and Human Services under sections 71-2226 and 71-2227 commits an offense and shall, upon conviction, be punished as follows: (a) If the aggregate value of all funds or other benefits obtained or attempted to be obtained is less than five hundred dollars, the person so convicted shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor; or (b) if the aggregate value of all funds and other benefits obtained or attempted to be obtained is five hundred dollars or more, the person so convicted shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1987, LB 643, § 20;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 24;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 621.